Hawaii statutes.
§88-76 Allowance on ordinary
disability retirement. Upon retirement for ordinary disability, a member
shall receive a maximum retirement allowance of one and three-fourths per cent
of the member's average final compensation for each year of credited service;
except that for each year of credited service as a judge, an elective officer,
or a legislative officer, the member shall receive a maximum retirement
allowance computed as provided in section 88-74(c), (d), (g), or (h), as
applicable. The minimum retirement allowance payable under this section shall
be thirty per cent of the member's average final compensation. [L 1925, c 55,
§6(4); RL 1935, pt of §7925; RL 1945, §708, subs 4; RL 1955, §6-45; am L 1957,
c 143, §4 and c 231, §1(d); am L 1961, c 175, §3 and c 181, §5; am L 1962, c
20, §3; am L 1963, c 127, §5; am L 1964, c 62, §7; am L 1965, c 222, §7; HRS
§88-66; am L 1969, c 110, pt of §1; am L 1975, c 199, §3; gen ch 1985; am L
1990, c 287, §1; am L 1991, c 96, §1(4); am L 1993, c 137, §1; am L 1997, c
374, §3; am L 2005, c 58, §8; am L 2006, c 169, §11; am L 2007, c 215, §9; am L
2011, c 163, §7]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next